csv2yaml/yaml_output/VII_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisinzininiigwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangisinzinoogwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisininigwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangisinogwen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisinzininigobanen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangisinzinoogobanen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisininigobanen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangisinogobanen
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisinzininig
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangisinzinog
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisininig
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangising
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisinzininigiban
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangisinzinoogiban
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv+NA: bangisininigiban
     bangisin+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx+NA: bangisingiban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv+NA: bangisinzininiwidogen
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx+NA: bangisinzinodogen
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv+NA: bangisinzininiwidog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx+NA: bangisinzinodog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv+NA: bangisininiwidogen
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx+NA: bangisinodogen
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv+NA: bangisininiwidog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx+NA: bangisinodog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [bangisinzininigobaniin,bangisinzininigobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [bangisinzinoogobaniin,bangisinzinoogobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: bangisinzininigoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: bangisinzinoogoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlObv+NA: [bangisininigobaniin,bangisininigobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0PlProx+NA: [bangisinogobaniin,bangisinogobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgObv+NA: bangisininigoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+0SgProx+NA: bangisinogoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv+NA: bangisinzininiwan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx+NA: bangisinzinoon
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv+NA: bangisinzinini
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx+NA: bangisinzinoon
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv+NA: bangisininiwan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx+NA: bangisinoon
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv+NA: bangisinini
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx+NA: bangisin
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [bangisinzininiibaniin,bangisinzininiibanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [bangisinzinoobaniin,bangisinzinoobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv+NA: bangisinzininiiban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx+NA: bangisinzinooban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv+NA: [bangisininiibaniin,bangisininiibanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx+NA: [bangisinoobaniin,bangisinoobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv+NA: bangisininiiban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx+NA: bangisinooban
